zh-CN: 苦味品种: 芳香; 花型; 果类; 草药; 辛辣; 其他
fi: Karvas lajike: Aromaattinen; Kukikas; Hedelmällinen; Yrttimäinen; Mausteinen; Muu
es: Variedad de cerveza amarga: Aromático; Floral; Frutal; De hierbas; Especiada; Otros
sv: Bitter sort: Aromatisk; Blommig; Frukt; Ört; Kryddig; Övrigt
pt-PT: Variedade amarga: Aromático; Floral; Frutado; Herbal; Picante; Outro
ja: 苦味のある品種: アロマチック; フローラル; フルーツ; ハーブ; スパイシー; その他
pt-BR: Variedade amarga: Aromático; Floral; Fruta; Ervas; Condimentado; Outro
tr: Acı Çeşitleri: Aromatik; Çiçek; Meyve; Bitkisel; Baharatlı; Diğer
sk-SK: Druh horkého alkoholického nápoja: Aromatický; Kvetinový; Ovocie; Bylinkový; Pikantný; Iné
ru: Тип биттера: Ароматическая; Цветочная; Фруктовая; Травяная; Пряная; Другая
nb: Bitter variant: Aromatisk; Blomster; Frukt; Urte; Krydret; Annet
nl: Variant bitter: Aromatisch; Gebloemd; Fruit; Kruidig; Pittig; Andere
lt-LT: Karčiosios trauktinės rūšis: Aromatinė; Gėlių; Vaisių; Žolelių; Aštri; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta gorkog likera: Aromatičan; Cvjetni; Voćni; Biljni; Pikantni; Ostalo
th: ลักษณะความขม: กลิ่นหอม; ลายดอก; ผลไม้; สมุนไพร; กลิ่น Spicy; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Sortiment de bitter: Aromatic; Floral; Fructe; Plante; Picant; Altele
fr: Variété amère: Aromatique; Floral; Fruit; Végétal; Épicé; Autre
vi: Loại vị đắng: Thơm; Hoa cỏ; Hoa quả; Thảo mộc; Cay; Khác
pl: Odmiana gorzka: Aromatyczny; Kwiatowy; Owoc; Ziołowy; Pikantny; Inne
it: Varietà amara: Aromatico; Floreale; Frutto; A base di erbe; Speziato; Altro
el: Ποικιλία Bitter: Αρωματικό; Φλοράλ; Φρούτα; Βοτανικό; Πικάντικο; Άλλο
ko: 비터 종류: 아로마; 꽃; 과일; 허브; 스파이스; 기타
cs: Druh bitteru: Aromatický; Květinový; Ovocný; Bylinná; Kořenité; Jiné
zh-TW: 苦味種類: 紫蘇; 花卉; 水果; 草本香調; 辛辣的; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta grenčice: Aromatična; Cvetlično; Sadje; Zeliščna; Pikantna; Drugo
da: Variant af bitter: Aromatisk; Blomster; Frugt; Urter; Krydret; Andet
en: Bitter variety: Aromatic; Floral; Fruit; Herbal; Spicy; Other
de: Bittere Sorte: Aromatisch; Blumenmuster; Frucht; Kräuter; Würzig; Sonstiges
hu: A bitter fajtája: Aromás; Virágos; Gyümölcsös; Gyógynövényes; Fűszeres; Egyéb
bg-BG: Сорт на битерите: Ароматен; Флорален; Плодове; Билков; Пикантен; Други